Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3135.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-22-22.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-22 entitled
"Miscellaneous Rules" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-22-22.1. Child passenger protection — Warnings of hazard and risk.
(a) All law enforcement officers in this state are authorized to may provide a verbal warning
to any person who shall be is deemed to have left a child under the age of seven (7) unattended in
a motor vehicle. The warning shall apprise inform the offending person of the dangers of this
practice including, but not limited to, the risk of kidnapping and/or abduction, and the dangers
which may result from the accumulation of excessive temperatures within the motor vehicle.
(b) No fine or sanction shall be imposed for a violation of this section, other than a verbal
warning, and no record of any kind shall be maintained of the warning. Nothing in this section shall
preclude prosecution under any applicable criminal law for acts arising from leaving a child
unattended in a motor vehicle that constitute a criminal offense. A violation of this section may
result in criminal penalties consistent with such laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005636
========